Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 1 General Provisions
57-4-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Alcoholic beverage” or “beverage” means and includes alcohol, spirits, liquor, wine, and every liquid containing alcohol, spirits, wine and capable of being consumed by a human being, other than patented medicine or beer as defined in § 57-5-101(b). Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this title, “alcoholic beverage” or “beverage” also includes any product containing distilled alcohol capable of being consumed by a human being manufactured or made with distilled alcohol irrespective of alcoholic content, including any infused product;

“Aquarium exhibition facility” means an enclosed facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

The facility is owned and operated by a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization that also owns and operates a “public aquarium” as defined in subdivision (29);

The facility contains a minimum area of ten thousand square feet (10,000 sq. ft.); and

The facility is used for either or both of the following purposes:

The exhibition to the public of artifacts, physical objects, pictures and movies; or

To aid in the education of the public by means of interactive displays or stations, learning laboratories, and classroom areas for instruction in the physical sciences, natural history or other educational disciplines;

“Bed and breakfast establishment” has the same meaning as set forth in § 68-14-502(1)(A); provided, that such bed and breakfast establishment is located in a county having a population of not less than fifty-one thousand three hundred fifty (51,350) nor more than fifty-one thousand four hundred fifty (51,450), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census and has eleven (11) furnished guest rooms;

“Bed and breakfast establishment” also means an establishment:

Founded in July 1987;

With twelve (12) rooms and five (5) cottages;

Located on approximately fifteen (15) acres;

Operating a full service day spa; and

Located in a county with not less than eighty-nine thousand eight hundred (89,800) and not more than eighty-nine thousand nine hundred (89,900), according to the 2010 or any subsequent federal census;

“Bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization” means any corporation which has been recognized as exempt from federal taxes under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)), or any organization having been in existence for at least two (2) consecutive years which expends at least sixty percent (60%) of its gross revenue exclusively for religious, educational or charitable purposes;

“Bona fide political organization” means any political campaign committee as defined in § 2-10-102 or any political party as defined in § 2-13-101;

“Caterer” means a business engaged in offering food and beverage service for a fee at various locations, which:

Operates a permanent catering hall on an exclusive basis or restaurant;

Has a complete and adequate commercial kitchen facility; and

Is licensed as a caterer by the Tennessee department of health;

“Civic arts center” means a complex that serves as a community center for the arts and further possesses the following characteristics:

Has a performance hall with at least one thousand one hundred (1,100) seats;

Has a flexible theater;

Consists of two (2) buildings and an outdoor plaza between the buildings;

Allows alcoholic beverages to be served when the civic arts center is hosting ticketed events, private functions or is rented to another party hosting an event open to the public; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than one hundred five thousand eight hundred (105,800) nor more than one hundred five thousand nine hundred (105,900), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Club” means a nonprofit association organized and existing under the laws of this state, which has been in existence and operating as a nonprofit association for at least two (2) years prior to the application for a license hereunder, having at least one hundred (100) members regularly paying dues, organized and operated exclusively for pleasure, recreation and other nonprofit purposes, no part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of any shareholder or member; and owning, hiring or leasing a building or space therein for the reasonable use of its members with suitable kitchen and dining room space and equipment and maintaining and using a sufficient number of employees for cooking, preparing and serving meals for its members and guests; provided, that no member or officer, agent or employee of the club is paid, or directly or indirectly receives, in the form of salary or other compensation, any profits from the sale of spirituous liquors, wines, champagnes or malt beverages beyond the amount of such salary as may be fixed by its members at an annual meeting or by its governing body out of the general revenue of the club. For the purpose of this section, tips which are added to the bills under club regulations shall not be considered as profits hereunder. The premises, as provided in § 57-4-101(a)(2) for a club, shall also include the golf course, tennis courts and the area immediately surrounding the swimming pool, if a club offers such amenities. The alcoholic beverage commission shall have specific authority through rules and regulations to define with specificity the terms used herein and to impose additional requirements upon applicants seeking a club license not inconsistent with the definition above;

“Club” also means an organization composed of members of the Tennessee national guard, air national guard, or other active or reserve military units which operate facilities located on land owned or leased by this state and which are operated exclusively for the pleasure and recreation of such organization's members, dependents and guests and which are generally referred to as “NCO Clubs” or “Officers Clubs.” Such NCO or officers clubs shall be subject to all of the requirements of subdivision (8)(A), except for those requirements relating to having a kitchen, kitchen equipment, and employees;

“Club” also means a nonprofit association organized and existing under the laws of this state which is located in a county having a population of not less than twenty-eight thousand six hundred sixty (28,660) nor more than twenty-eight thousand six hundred ninety (28,690), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Such club shall be located in a development containing no less than four hundred forty (440) acres and shall be organized and operated exclusively for the pleasure, recreation and other nonprofit purposes of its members and their guests. No part of the net earnings of the association shall inure to the benefit of any shareholder or member. The club shall provide to its members a regulation golf course, tennis courts, and a swimming pool. The club shall own, hire or lease a building or buildings for the reasonable use of its members with suitable kitchen and dining room space and equipment. Such club shall maintain and use a sufficient number of employees for cooking, preparing and serving meals for its members and guests. No member or officer, agent or employee of the club shall be paid, or directly or indirectly receive in the form of salary or other compensation any profits from the sale of alcoholic beverage or malt beverage beyond the amount of such salary as may be fixed by its members at an annual meeting, or by its governing body out of the general revenues of the club. For the purpose of this section, tips which are added to the bills under club regulations shall not be considered as profits hereunder. The alcoholic beverage commission shall have specific authority through rules and regulations to define with specificity the terms used herein and to impose additional requirements upon applicants seeking a club license not inconsistent with this definition;

“Club” also means a for-profit recreational club organized and existing under the laws of this state and which has been in existence and operating for at least two (2) years prior to the application for a license. Such club shall have at least one hundred (100) members regularly paying dues, and shall be organized and operated exclusively for recreation, and providing to its members a regulation golf course and owning, hiring or leasing a building or buildings for the reasonable use of its members, with suitable kitchen and dining room space and equipment, and lodging facilities consisting of not less than ten (10) rooms. Such club shall maintain and use a sufficient number of employees for cooking, preparing and serving meals for its members and guests and providing lodging facilities to its members and guests. Other than the payment of dividends to the shareholders of the club from its net income derived from all of its operations, no member or officer, agent or employee of the club shall be paid, or shall directly or indirectly receive in the form of salary or other compensation, any profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages or malt beverages beyond the amount of such salary as may be fixed by the shareholders of the corporation at an annual meeting by its governing body out of the general revenues of the club. For the purpose of this section, tips which are added to the bills under club regulations shall not be considered as profits hereunder. The alcoholic beverage commission shall have specific authority through rules and regulations to define with specificity the terms used herein and to impose additional requirements upon applicants seeking a club license not inconsistent with this definition. The alcoholic beverage commission shall not issue a license to any for-profit recreational club which restricts membership based on race or religion or sex. In any proceeding concerning a license denial or revocation under this subdivision (8)(D)(i), no quota or numerical percentage shall be used to establish proof of the prohibited discrimination among the club's membership;

Notwithstanding § 57-4-101(a)(2) to the contrary, this subdivision (8)(D) shall not apply in any municipality which has not approved the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises pursuant to § 57-4-103;

This subdivision (8)(D) only applies in counties having a population of not less than two hundred eighty-seven thousand seven hundred (287,700) nor more than two hundred eighty-seven thousand eight hundred (287,800), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Club” also means a for-profit recreational club, organized and existing under the laws of this state, which has at least two hundred fifty (250) dues-paying members who pay dues of at least one hundred dollars ($100) a year. Such club shall have golf courses containing at least twenty-seven (27) holes, collectively, for the use of its members and guests, and have suitable kitchen and dining facilities. Such club shall serve at least one (1) meal daily, five (5) days a week. Such club may not compensate or pay any officer, director, agent or employee any profits from the sale of alcoholic or malt beverages based upon the volume of such beverages sold. Such club shall not discriminate against any patron or potential member on the basis of gender, race, religion or national origin;

This subdivision (8)(E) only applies in counties having a population of not less than eighty thousand (80,000) nor more than eighty-three thousand (83,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

(a) “Club” also means a for-profit recreational club, organized and existing under the laws of this state, which has at least two hundred twenty-five (225) dues-paying members who pay dues of at least three hundred dollars ($300) a year. Such club shall have a clubhouse with not less than five thousand square feet (5,000 sq. ft.), golf courses containing at least eighteen (18) holes, collectively, for the use of its members and guests, and have suitable kitchen and dining facilities. Such club shall serve at least one (1) meal daily, five (5) days a week. Such club may not compensate or pay any officer, director, agent or employee any profits from the sale of alcoholic or malt beverages based upon the volume of such beverages sold. Such club shall not discriminate against any patron or potential member on the basis of gender, race, religion or national origin. It is the express intention of the general assembly that the law concerning the purchase or possession of alcoholic beverages by persons under twenty-one (21) years of age be strictly enforced in such clubs;

This subdivision (8)(F) only applies in any county having a population of:

not less than nor more than

21,800 22,100

22,600 23,000

34,850 35,000

80,000 83,000

103,100 103,400

according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Club” also means a clubhouse owned and operated by a for-profit corporation, which is open to the public but has at least one hundred fifty (150) private members and seats at least one hundred (100) persons, that is a planned part of a residential development consisting of no less than two hundred fifty (250) acres and at least one hundred ninety (190) residential units, and such development contains an eighteen-hole golf course under separate ownership; provided, that such club is located in a county having a population of not less than one hundred three thousand one hundred (103,100) nor more than one hundred three thousand four hundred (103,400), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census and in a municipality which lies within two (2) contiguous counties;

“Club” also means a facility owned by a for-profit corporation incorporated in Tennessee prior to September 30, 2000, as a private club which does not discriminate against members or potential members or bona fide guests of such members on the basis of gender, race, religion or national origin, and further possesses the following characteristics:

Is located within three (3) miles of a municipal golf course owned and operated by a home-rule municipality located in a county having a charter form of government and having a population of not less than three hundred eighty-two thousand (382,000) nor more than three hundred eighty-two thousand one hundred (382,100), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Has, on July 3, 2002, a minimum of three hundred (300) members paying annual dues with a copy of membership applications on file on the premises, and which issues to its members a membership card which authorizes admittance of the member and bona fide guests of such member; and

Has a kitchen and dining area having a minimum seating capacity of seventy-five (75) in a building having at least eighteen hundred square feet (1800 sq. ft.);

“Club” also means a for-profit recreational club organized and existing under the laws of this state which has been in existence and operating for at least two (2) years prior to June 11, 2003, and which is located in any county having a population of not less than three hundred seven thousand eight hundred (307,800) nor more than three hundred seven thousand nine hundred (307,900), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and further possesses the following characteristics:

The premises, as provided in §57-4-101(a)(2) for a club, whether such parcels comprising the club premises are contiguous or not, shall also include the golf course, including beverage carts; tennis courts; all areas of the clubhouse; the area immediately surrounding the swimming pool, if a club offers such amenities; and all other related recreational facilities;

Has at least one hundred seventy-five (175) members paying annual dues and does not discriminate against members or potential members or bona fide guests of such members on the basis of gender, race, religion or national origin;

Is organized and operated exclusively for recreation and providing a regulation eighteen-hole golf course for the use of its members and guests, and also offers for the use of its members and guests a swimming pool and tennis facility; and

Has a clubhouse with not less than three thousand square feet (3,000 sq. ft.) with suitable kitchen, dining facilities and equipment, serving at least one (1) meal daily, at least five (5) days a week;

The club may not compensate or pay any officer, director, agent or employee any profits from the sale of alcoholic or malt beverages based on the volume of those beverages sold;

The premises, as provided in § 57-4-101(a)(2) for a club, whether such parcels comprising the club premises are contiguous or not, shall also include the golf course, including beverage carts; tennis courts; all areas of the clubhouse; the area immediately surrounding the swimming pool, if a club offers such amenities; and all other related recreational facilities; and

Does not discriminate against members or potential members or bona fide guests of such members on the basis of gender, race, religion, or national origin;

Does not discriminate against members or potential members or bona fide guests of such members on the basis of gender, race, color, age, religion, or national origin; and

not less than nor more than

143,900 144,000

300,000 400,000

700,000

according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Any such hotel whose facilities are located on the premises of an area meeting the definition of a hotel under this subdivision (21)(F)(iii) may exercise the privileges authorized under this chapter anywhere within that area, and, in addition, may exercise the privilege authorized under this chapter on any location identified to the commission and held out to the public as part of such hotel property irrespective of the actual owner of the location, where the hotel is authorized by written contract or lease to provide hotel or resort services by the owner of such location; and

Notwithstanding this title or any rule to the contrary, a hotel under this subdivision (21)(F)(iii) shall be able to:

Hold a manufacturer's license under § 57-3-202 or a nonmanufacturer nonresident seller's permit under § 57-3-602(c) or both, and such license or permit may be for facilities on or off the hotel premises;

Offer tastings, with or without charge, and sell sealed bottles in a tasting room or a gift shop on the hotel premises of product manufactured pursuant to the license or permit in subdivision (21)(F)(iii)(i )(1 ), as long as such tastings and sealed bottles are offered only to guests of the hotel, as defined in this section, and private owners of homes on the hotel property and are not offered anywhere except in the tasting room and the gift shops;

Sell beer and alcoholic beverages by the drink for on-premises consumption anywhere on the hotel premises, except for the tasting room and the gift shops; and

Only sell at retail or provide samples of product that it has obtained from a wholesaler licensed under § 57-3-203, and such wholesaler shall remit all taxes imposed under §§ 57-3-302 and 57-3-501, which shall be collected from the hotel based upon its retail sales, and § 57-6-201. For products acquired from a wholesaler by a hotel under this subdivision (21)(F)(iii) that are manufactured by the hotel, the wholesaler may permit the hotel to deliver its products to the location on its premises where such retail sales and samples will be effected, provided the wholesaler permitting such direct shipment must include the amounts delivered in its inventory and depletions for purposes of tax collections;

A hotel under this subdivision (21)(F)(iii) must comply with all the requirements of this chapter and shall be subject to the restrictions imposed upon licenses other than § 57-4-103;

At least thirty (30) rooms for the sleeping accommodations of guests for adequate pay; and

A dining room;

“Hotel” also includes a facility that possesses the following characteristics:

Is located in a building on which construction began prior to 1940;

Is located approximately twenty-two (22) miles south of Interstate 40 on U.S. Highway 412;

Is fronted on the north side by U.S. Highway 412 and is less than one (1) mile from a scenic river as defined in title 11, chapter 13;

Has at least twelve (12) rooms for guest sleeping accommodations;

Has a separate room for conferences or meetings;

Has at least a forty-seat dining area that has been approved by the local health department and that serves meals at least four (4) days a week, with exceptions of closures for private groups or events, seasonal closures, vacations, and periods of general maintenance or remodeling by the owners;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than seven thousand nine hundred one (7,901) nor more than eight thousand (8,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A hotel under this subdivision (21)(I) must comply with all the requirements of this chapter and shall be subject to the restrictions imposed upon licenses other than § 57-4-103;

Is a public place which has a seating capacity for at least forty (40) patrons and that is kept, used, maintained, advertised and held out to the public as a place where during regular hours of operation:

Alcoholic beverages, beer or wine are served to patrons;

A menu of prepared food is made available to patrons;

The gross revenue from the sale of prepared food is fifty percent (50%) or less than the gross revenue from the sale of alcoholic beverages; provided, however, that gross revenue of more than fifty percent (50%) from the sale of prepared food shall not prevent a facility from receiving a “limited service restaurant” license or subject such facility to a fine from the commission for having gross revenue of more than fifty percent (50%) from the sale of prepared food. For purposes of determining the gross revenue from the sale of prepared food, chips, popcorn, pretzels, peanuts and similar snack items shall not be included in gross revenue from the sale of prepared food sold;

The facility affirmatively establishes, to the satisfaction of the commission, that it has complied and will comply with the requirements of § 57-4-204;

The facility provides adequate security during the regular hours of operation; and

Sleeping accommodations are not provided;

Is located within the jurisdictional boundaries of a political subdivision which has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises as provided in § 57-4-103; and

Is located in an area which is properly zoned for facilities authorized to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises;

(A) “Motor speedway” means a motor sports facility that possesses the following characteristics:

Is located in a county having a population of not less than sixty-seven thousand six hundred (67,600) nor more than sixty-seven thousand nine hundred (67,900), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and at least one (1) municipality located in such county has adopted liquor by the drink;

Contains a 1.33 mile superspeedway;

Is situated on a site of at least five hundred (500) acres; and

Has a seating capacity of fifty thousand (50,000) with the capability to expand to one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) grandstand seats and one hundred (100) luxury skyboxes;

“Motor speedway” also means a motor sports facility that possesses the following characteristics:

Is located in a county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Contains a three-quarter-mile oval track with a seating capacity of sixteen thousand (16,000) seats; and

Contains a one-quarter-mile drag strip with a seating capacity of fifteen thousand (15,000) seats;

“Museum” also means an “art museum” which is a building or institution serving as a repository of works of art for public display and further possesses the following characteristics:

The art museum is owned and operated by a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization which has been in existence for at least twenty-five (25) years;

The art museum is located in a building which contains not less than fifty thousand square feet (50,000 sq. ft.); and

The art museum is located in a former world's fair site; and

“Museum” also means a building or institution serving as a repository or exhibition facility for works of art for public display and further possesses the following characteristics:

The museum is owned and operated by a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization;

The museum is located in a building which contains not less than one hundred thousand square feet (100,000 sq. ft.);

The museum is located in a building that previously served as a United States postal service facility; and

The museum is located in a municipality or county having a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Museum” also means a building or institution serving as a tribute to soul music and which houses a music academy and further possesses the following characteristics:

The museum and music academy is located on the original site of a recording studio; and

The museum and music academy is located in a county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Museum” also means an “art museum” which is a building or institution serving as a repository of works of art for public display and further possesses the following characteristics:

The art museum is owned and operated by a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization;

The museum has been in existence for at least fifty (50) years;

The museum focuses on American art from the colonial period to the present day;

The museum is located in a historical mansion and a sleek contemporary building on the bluffs overlooking the Tennessee River;

The museum does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin; and

The museum is located in a county having a population of not less than three hundred seven thousand eight hundred (307,800) nor more than three hundred seven thousand nine hundred (307,900), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Museum” also means a building or institution dedicated to the public display, preservation, and promotion of fine metalwork and further possesses the following characteristics:

The museum opened to the public in 1979;

The museum is located on at least three (3) acres overlooking the Mississippi River;

The museum features a fully operational blacksmith shop and sand-casting foundry;

The museum is owned and operated by a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization; and

The museum is located in a county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated recreational facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Ownership and operation by a profit type corporation having a capitalization of not less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000);

Situated in a geographical area wholly controlled by the operator of the facility and having not less than six thousand (6,000) acres of contiguous land, not less than five thousand (5,000) acres of which is to be developed and maintained in accordance with sound ecological and environmental practices, such requirement to be subject at all times to the oversight and approval of the department of environment and conservation, which shall not less often than once a year make a written report thereof to the commission. Satisfactory compliance with this requirement and certification thereof by the department to the commission shall be a condition precedent to the issuance or renewal of the permit provided for in § 57-4-201;

Continuous maintenance of lodging accommodations consisting of not less than two hundred (200) hotel or motel rooms in a building or buildings designed for such purpose;

Continuous maintenance of facilities for the accommodation of conventions of not less than four hundred (400) persons;

Maintenance within the recreational area of at least one (1) of the following types of sporting facilities:

A golf course of at least eighteen (18) holes;

A lake covering not less than one hundred (100) acres adapted for boating and fishing;

A ski slope;

Maintenance, in addition to one (1) or more of the facilities enumerated in subdivision (27)(A)(v), of two (2) or more of the following types of recreational facilities:

Area for camping;

Tennis courts;

Swimming pool;

Trails for hiking and/or horseback riding;

Equestrian center;

A twenty-four-hour per day security force approved as to adequacy by the commission;

A hotel, motel or restaurant located within a municipality having a population of one thousand (1,000) or more persons, according to the federal census of 1970 or any subsequent federal census in which at least fifty percent (50%) of the assessed valuation (as shown by the tax assessment rolls or books of the municipality) of the real estate in the municipality consists of hotels, motels, and tourist courts accommodations, providing the voters of the municipality have heretofore by referendum pursuant to § 57-4-103, approved the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, and such referendum shall be authorized, notwithstanding the population requirements set forth in § 57-3-106. For purposes of implementation of this subdivision (27)(B), the sale of alcoholic beverages shall be limited to hotels, restaurants, and clubs as defined in this section. To ensure proper control and development of the tourist industry of such municipality, any applicant for a license under this subdivision (27)(B) shall first obtain approval from a majority of the legislative body of the municipality, which may adopt rules and regulations governing its procedure and setting forth limitations and restrictions including, but not limited to, the number and location of licensed establishments and requiring approval by the legislative body as to the good moral character of each applicant for a license;

A commercially operated recreational facility containing all of the following characteristics:

Ownership and operation by a profit type corporation or partnership;

Situated in a geographical area controlled by the operator of the facility, having not less than two thousand five hundred (2,500) acres of land;

Continuous maintenance of lodging accommodations consisting of not less than one hundred (100) hotel or motel rooms in a building or buildings designed for such purpose;

The maintenance of a ski slope with necessary lifts or tows for use during skiing season;

Continuous maintenance of restaurant facilities for seating at tables of not less than two hundred (200) persons, with adequate kitchen facilities; and

Located within a municipality with a population of not less than one thousand fifty (1,050) nor more than one thousand seventy-five (1,075), according to the 1980 or any subsequent census;

To ensure proper control and development of the tourist industry of such municipality, any applicant for a license under this subdivision (27)(C) shall first obtain approval from a majority of the legislative body of the municipality, which may adopt rules and regulations governing its procedure and setting forth limitations and restrictions including, but not limited to, the number and location of licensed establishments and requiring approval by the legislative body as to the good moral character of each applicant for a license;

A commercially operated facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Situated in a geographical area controlled by the operator of the facility, having not less than one hundred seventy-nine (179) acres of land;

A public golf course of at least eighteen (18) holes with a practice green and irrigation system;

Such facility has a club house with at least five thousand square feet (5,000 sq. ft.) that can accommodate up to two hundred fifty (250) guests for events;

Has separate meeting rooms for multiple events;

Has a cart barn on the property that holds no less than sixty (60) golf carts;

Such facility has a maintenance shop with at least seven thousand square feet (7,000 sq. ft.);

Is located inside of:

A black bear habitat community; and

A conservation community;

Surrounded by over one hundred (100) rental cabins;

At least fifty percent (50%) of the property boundaries border a national park;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than one hundred twenty-three thousand one (123,001) nor more than one hundred twenty-three thousand one hundred (123,100) according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated recreational facility containing all of the following characteristics:

Ownership and operation by a for-profit corporation or partnership;

Located in a geographic area managed by the operator of the facility, containing a minimum area of one hundred fifty (150) contiguous acres;

Continuous maintenance of lodging accommodations of not less than fifty (50) rooms available for guests, tourists or for business meetings located in a building or buildings designed for accommodations or business meetings;

Maintenance of lakeside marina facilities, a golf course of not less than eighteen (18) holes, and riding trails and stables on the premises;

Located within a municipality with a population of not less than six thousand three hundred seventy-five (6,375) nor more than six thousand four hundred (6,400), according to the 1980 or any subsequent federal census; and

Whose manager shall have been specifically approved by a majority of the legislative body of the municipality in which such licensee is located as being an individual of good moral character;

A facility, whether open to the public or limited to members and guests of the development on which it is located, owned or operated, pursuant to a license by a homeowners or residential association, which facility is kept, used and maintained as a place where meals are served and where meals are actually and regularly served, with adequate and sanitary kitchen facilities and which facility meets all of the following characteristics:

The facility must be located in a county having a population of not less than forty-seven thousand (47,000) nor more than forty-seven thousand five hundred (47,500), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The facility must be located on the premises of a planned, gated residential development of at least eighty (80) acres with at least nine thousand (9,000) lineal feet of water frontage on an established and designated navigable waterway; and

The facility must be located within the limits of a development which contains a marina and tennis court facilities;

A club, either for profit or not for profit, which has been in existence for two (2) consecutive years during which time it has maintained a membership of at least three thousand (3,000) members and which maintains club facilities on or adjacent to property offering recreational services available to its members, which services shall include one (1) or more of the following:

Golf course with at least eighteen (18) holes;

Tennis courts;

Marina facilities with a minimum of four hundred (400) slips.

Any such club whose club facilities are located on the premises of an area meeting the definition of a “premier type tourist resort” under this section may exercise its privileges authorized under this chapter anywhere within such area;

A commercially operated recreational facility, whether open to the public or limited to members and guests of an association or of the development on which it is located, owned and operated by an association or corporation and in connection with an eighteen-hole golf course, which facility is kept, used and maintained as a place where meals are actually and regularly served, with adequate and sanitary kitchen facilities, and which facility meets all of the following characteristics:

The facility must be located in a county having a population of not less than thirty-four thousand seven hundred thirty (34,730) nor more than thirty-four thousand seven hundred sixty (34,760), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The facility must be located in a development containing no less than four hundred twenty (420) acres and no more than four hundred fifty (450) acres;

The facility must be located within limits of a development which contains an eighteen-hole golf course;

The facility must have no less than five thousand (5,000) enclosed square feet (5,000 sq. ft.);

The facility must be located no less than one-half (½) mile from the right-of-way of an interstate highway; and

The facility must be located within the limits of a development which contains a lake of not less than twenty-eight (28) acres which is entirely within the limits of the development;

A commercially operated recreational facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

(a) Ownership and development by a for profit corporation;

(i) (a) Ownership and development by a for profit corporation;

Situated in a geographic area controlled by such entity and having not less than twenty-five (25) contiguous acres of land which is divided by a four-lane highway;

Designed to contain picnic facilities, museum buildings, retail sales areas, retail food dispensing outlets, and restaurant areas;

Maintenance of a limited access area containing a former residence, a swimming pool, a handball court, and stables where no pedestrian access is allowed and all guests entering must be carried by a motor vehicle; and

Location within a county having a population of not less than seven hundred seventy thousand (770,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Premier type tourist resort,” as defined in this subdivision (27)(I), shall be authorized to sell or serve alcoholic beverages on the premises of such resort only at special functions, wherein attendance is limited to invited guests or groups and not to the general public;

An entity operating a commercial golf related recreational facility, whether open to the public or limited to members and guests of an association or owners and guests of a development upon or adjacent to which the facility is located, which entity or facility meets all of the following criteria:

The facility is located in a county having a population of not less than thirty-four thousand seven hundred thirty (34,730) nor more than thirty-four thousand eight hundred (34,800), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The facility is operated in conjunction with an eighteen (18) hole golf course;

The facility is kept, used and maintained as a place where meals are actually and regularly served with such adequate and sanitary kitchen facilities as might be needed to meet the reasonable requirements of its patrons, members, or guests;
